Massachusetts, session 194th, H2869.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Group 4 paragraph (g) of sub-division 2 of section 3 of chapter 32, as amended by section
(1) of Chapter 71 of the acts of 2006, is hereby further amended by inserting after the words
"supervising prison camp officer," the following words:-- "all Bargaining Unit 8 employees in
the Department of Youth Services"
of 1